Rhode Island statutes. Title 46 Waters and Navigation
Chapter 15.5 Bristol County Water Supply

46-15.5-1.
Name.

This chapter shall be referred to as the “Bristol County Water Supply Act”.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1.

46-15.5-2.
Legislative declaration.

Recognizing the importance of protecting, maintaining and utilizing all sources of potable water and recognizing that with the continued demands on the Scituate Reservoir, this general assembly hereby finds and declares that:

The citizens of Bristol County lack an adequate and secure supply of potable water;

Heretofore acting through the Bristol County water authority, the citizens of Bristol County have presented a proposal for the construction to bring water from the Scituate Reservoir to Bristol County;

The state and its citizens would be better served and the environment enhanced by the construction of an additional connection connecting Bristol County to the Scituate Reservoir;

The need for water in Bristol County is critical and requires immediate and prompt action on the part of the state, its agencies, boards and commissions;

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 92, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 95, § 1.]

The alternatives authorized by this chapter will be less expensive than the East Providence connection, so-called; and

Reliance by citizens of East Providence and Bristol County on a single connection would create a hazard to the health, safety, and welfare of the citizens of East Providence and Bristol County, and, therefore, the construction of an emergency connection that shall permit water to flow in either direction is a public necessity.

[Deleted by P.L. 2021, ch. 92, § 1 and P.L. 2021, ch. 95, § 1.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2021, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; P.L. 2021, ch. 95, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

46-15.5-3.
Pipeline connection.

The Bristol County water authority shall design, plan, permit, and construct an additional connection to the City of Providence water supply system and construct a new water transmission line to its existing reservoirs. The additional connection to Providence will be constructed north of Fields Point across the Providence River through subterranean excavation, directional drilling or micro tunneling for a pipe not to exceed thirty (30) inches in diameter and without any excavation of the river bed and to extend its transmission mains into and through the city of East Providence to connect with the distribution system of the Bristol County water authority to effect a regular and emergency connection at such places and on such terms and pursuant to such plans as the water resources board shall approve pursuant to the provisions of §

46-15-7

.

In addition, the Bristol County water authority shall design, plan, permit, and construct an emergency connection to the City of East Providence water supply system at such point and upon such terms and conditions as the authority, the city and the water resources board shall agree upon.

It is hereby being determined that such connections are just and equitable to all the municipalities affected thereby and that such connections are justified by public necessity and are desirable, and will not adversely affect present and future necessities for sources of water supply, including an adequate flow to the Pawtuxet River.

The Providence water supply board shall release a minimum of nine million (9,000,000) gallons of water per day into the Pawtuxet River from the Scituate Reservoir, thereby assisting the cities of Cranston and Warwick and the towns of Coventry and West Warwick to achieve its wastewater treatment plan permit limits and enable the Pawtuxet River to meet EPA Class C water quality standards.

The water resources board shall give priority consideration to the application, when and if filed by the Bristol County water authority pursuant to the provisions of §

46-15-7

, but the application need only address the plans and specifications for the connections and the means by which the connections will be effected. There shall be no requirement that the Bristol County water authority demonstrate public necessity, or whether the plans and specifications give consideration to present and future necessities for the sources of water supply. The design contained in the plans and specifications shall afford the Bristol County water authority a capacity not to exceed 7.5 million (7,500,000) gallons per day maximum day demand. The provisions of §

46-15.3-7.6

or chapter 15.3 of this title shall not apply to any approval of the connection.

The design, of both the new raw water transmission line and the additional connections to the City of Providence water supply system including the emergency connection to the City of East Providence water supply system shall be commenced simultaneously, and such projects shall be simultaneously pursued to completion with all reasonable diligence.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 52.

46-15.5-4.
Rates and charges for water.

If either the city of East Providence or the Bristol County water authority shall utilize the emergency connection, the party providing water shall charge the party for the water so provided an amount determined by applying the rate charged to such providing party by the Providence water supply board under the then current schedule applicable to such party. No such connection nor the transmission of water through such connection nor the payment of the surcharge shall subject the City of East Providence to the jurisdiction of the public utilities commission pursuant to §

39-1-2(a)(20)

.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 1.

46-15.5-5.
Financing.

The Bristol County water authority extension of its transmission system to connect to the Providence water supply system through the additional connection together with the emergency connection as set forth in §

46-15.5-3

and the cost of planning, design and permitting the improvements to the Bristol County water authority’s existing system as set forth in §

46-15.5-6

(the “existing system” enhancement) as directed by the water resources board shall be deemed an approved intersystem facility as that term is defined in §

46-15.2-3

and fifty percent (50%) of the cost thereof shall be considered eligible for funding pursuant to the provisions of chapter 15.2 of this title. There is hereby included in the 1994 capital budget an amount equal to $14.8 million ($14,800,000) to be used to fund such additional connections, the emergency connection and the existing system enhancement. The water resources board is hereby directed to take such steps as shall be necessary to transfer any funds heretofore set aside or designated for purposes of providing funding to the Bristol County water authority for the cross-bay pipeline to the East Providence connection authorized and directed by this chapter.

The Bristol County water authority is deemed to have met the provisions of §

46-15.2-5(d)(2)

, (3), (4), (5), (6), (8), (e) and (f) with respect to the connections authorized by this chapter. The water resources board shall give priority to the application filed by the Bristol County water authority in accordance with chapter 15.2 of this title and this chapter and shall approve the project based upon its findings of fact as provided in §§

46-15.2-5(d)(1)

and (7) without the necessity of meeting any other conditions precedent set forth in §§

46-15.2-4(e)

and

46-15.2-6(a)

.

All other state agencies having jurisdiction over the Bristol County water authority with respect to any permit required to design and construct the additional and emergency connections authorized by this chapter shall give administrative, hearing and decisional priority to any application for any such permit.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 52.

46-15.5-6.
[Repealed.]

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2007, ch. 340, § 52; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 93, § 1, effective July 1, 2021; repealed by P.L. 2021, ch. 94, § 1, effective July 1, 2021.

46-15.5-6.1.
Limitation on expenditures.

The Bristol County water authority shall pay fifty percent (50%) of costs of planning, design, permitting and construction of the additional and emergency connections authorized by this chapter until the total cost thereof shall equal $29.6 million ($29,600,000). All costs in excess of $29.6 million ($29,600,000) will be paid by the Bristol County water authority. In the event that the total expenditures by the Bristol County water authority for the planning, design, permitting and construction of the additional and emergency connections authorized hereby shall be less than $14.8 million ($14,800,000), the Bristol County water authority shall expend the differences for the planning, design, permitting and construction of the existing systems enhancements, with the first priority being given to the completion of a new raw water transmission line to the existing Bristol County reservoirs.

History of Section.

P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 2.

46-15.5-7.
Connection with Providence water supply system.

The provisions of § 18 of chapter 1278 of the public laws of Rhode Island, of 1915 as amended, dealing with the connection of the Bristol County water authority with the Providence water supply system are hereby amended to authorize the additional connection and the emergency connections in the manner approved by the water resources board in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and with chapter 15 of this title. That § 18 is further amended by adding the City of East Providence to those cities wherein all pipelines and other water works appurtenances of the Bristol County water authority are exempt from local taxation. The City of Providence is authorized and directed to treat the additional connection as an acceptable “delivery point” pursuant to those provisions of that certain agreement dated March 28, 1986 between the Bristol County water authority and the City of Providence, subject nevertheless to the provisions of § 5 of such agreement.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1; P.L. 1993, ch. 243, § 1.

46-15.5-8.
Repealed.

46-15.5-9.
Administrative priority.

Any state agency, board, council, or commission shall give priority in terms of consideration of, and hearing on, any application made by the Bristol County water authority seeking necessary approvals to carry out the provisions of this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1.

46-15.5-10.
Transfer of functions.

Notwithstanding any transfer of functions from the water resources board to the department of environmental management or any provision of law, the water resources board shall retain all jurisdiction with respect to chapter 15 of this title as in effect prior to the enactment of chapter 461 of the Public Laws of 1990, and as amended, herein shall remain in effect for purposes of implementing this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 1992, ch. 134, § 1.